Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2342.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 33, chapter 16, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 33-1816.01, to read: START_STATUTE33-1816.01. Shade structures; reasonable restrictions; municipal zoning; definition A. Notwithstanding any provision in the community documents, an association may not prohibit the backyard installation or use of a shade structure. B. An association may adopt reasonable rules regarding the size, placement or appearance of a shade structure if those rules do not prevent the installation, impair the functioning, restrict the use or unreasonably affect the cost of the structure and are not more restrictive than the zoning ordinances regarding shade structure height and setbacks for a single-family home in the city or town in which the planned community is located. C. For the purposes of this section, "shade structure" means a commercially produced or professionally manufactured moveable or permanent structure that is designed to protect an area from sunlight, including an umbrella, awning, shade sail, gazebo, pergola or canopy.END_STATUTE APPROVED BY THE GOVERNOR JUNE 4, 2026. FILED IN THE OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE JUNE 5, 2026.